Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202014-2110
Utilities district; employees; removal.

No regular appointee or employee of the metropolitan utilities district,
except the individual appointed in section 14-2109, who has been in its service
consecutively for more than one year shall be subject to removal except upon a two-thirds vote
of the full board and then only for cause which shall be stated in writing
and filed with the secretary of the board at least ten days prior to a hearing
preceding such removal.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 14, p. 356;

R.S.1913, § 4256;

Laws 1919, c. 33, § 3, p. 108;

C.S.1922, § 3759;

C.S.1929, § 14-1015;

Laws 1941, c. 20, § 1, p. 110;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-1015;

Laws 1943, c. 38, § 1(1), p. 180;

R.S.1943, § 14-1021;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1021;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB207, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB208, § 2.